Nebraska, session 109, LB916.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB916 LB916
2026 2026
Section 1. The Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission may
approve an application for the construction of a pipeline to be used for
the transport of liquid carbon dioxide provided that evidence is first
presented to the satisfaction of the commission showing a compelling need
to reduce greenhouse gas emissions in Nebraska, that the proposed
pipeline shall be operationally safe, that the proposed pipeline shall
not incur any costs to the taxpayers of Nebraska, that the proposed
pipeline shall result in the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, that
the proposed pipeline shall not harm the environment, and that the
proposed pipeline shall provide an economic benefit to Nebraska and its
citizens.
Sec. 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person may
not exercise the right of eminent domain to acquire a right-of-way for,
to construct, or to operate a pipeline for the preponderant purpose of
transporting carbon oxide.
Sec. 3. Section 57-1101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1101 Any person engaged in, and any company, corporation, or
association formed or created for the purpose of, transporting or
conveying crude oil, petroleum, gases, or other products thereof,
excluding carbon oxide, in interstate commerce through or across the
State of Nebraska or intrastate within the State of Nebraska, and
desiring or requiring a right-of-way or other interest in real estate and
being unable to agree with the owner or lessee of any land, lot, right-
of-way, or other property for the amount of compensation for the use and
occupancy of so much of any lot, land, real estate, right-of-way, or
other property as may be reasonably necessary for the laying, relaying,
operation, and maintenance of any such pipeline or the location of any
plant or equipment necessary to operate such pipeline, shall have the
right to acquire the same for such purpose through the exercise of the
power of eminent domain, except that for any major oil pipeline as
-2-

LB916 LB916
2026 2026
defined in section 57-1404 to be placed in operation in the State of
Nebraska after November 23, 2011, any such person, company, corporation,
or association shall comply with section 57-1503 and receive the approval
of the Governor for the route of the pipeline under such section or shall
apply for and receive an order approving the application under the Major
Oil Pipeline Siting Act, prior to having the rights provided under this
section. If condemnation procedures have not been commenced within two
years after the date the Governor's approval is granted or after the date
of receipt of an order approving an application under the Major Oil
Pipeline Siting Act, the right under this section expires. The procedure
to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in
sections 76-704 to 76-724.
Sec. 4. Section 57-1602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1602 The Legislature finds that the geologic , recognizes, and
declares that it is in the public interest to promote the geologic
storage of carbon dioxide. Doing so will benefit the state and the global
environment by reducing greenhouse gas emissions and will help ensure the
viability of the state's energy and power industries, to the economic
benefit of Nebraska and its citizens. Further, geologic storage of carbon
dioxide, a potentially valuable commodity, may allow for its ready
availability if needed for commercial, industrial, or other uses.
Geologic storage of carbon dioxide , however, to be practical and
effective, requires cooperative use of surface and subsurface property
interests and the collaboration of property owners in order to be
practical and effective. Obtaining consent from all affected property
owners is required before construction can begin on a storage facility.
may not be feasible, requiring procedures that promote, in a manner fair
to all interests, cooperative management, thereby ensuring the maximum
use of natural resources. Use of any subsurface stratum and any materials
and fluids contained therein for geologic storage of carbon dioxide is a
-3-

LB916 LB916
2026 2026
reasonable and beneficial use.
Sec. 5. Section 57-1610, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1610 Before issuing a permit, the commission shall find:
(1) That the storage operator has complied with all requirements set
by the commission;
(2) That the storage facility is suitable and feasible for carbon
dioxide injection and storage;
(3) That the carbon dioxide to be stored is of a quality that allows
it to be safely and efficiently stored in the storage reservoir;
(4) That the proposed storage facility will not endanger surface
waters or underground sources of drinking water;
(5) That carbon dioxide will not escape into the atmosphere or
surface waters from the storage reservoir;
(6) That the storage facility will not endanger human health or
unduly endanger the environment;
(7) That the horizontal and vertical boundaries of the storage
reservoir are defined;
(8) That the storage operator will establish a testing and
monitoring plan to assess the location and migration of carbon dioxide
injected for storage and to ensure compliance with all permit, statutory,
and administrative requirements;
(9) That the storage operator has satisfied all of the requirements
in subdivisions (2) through (8) of this section if the storage operator
has obtained all permits required by the applicable underground injection
control program permitting authority for each storage facility injection
well;
(10) That the storage facility is in the public interest;
(11) In accordance with the United States Environmental Protection
Agency Underground Injection Control Program, that the storage operator
has completed a comprehensive geologic study which includes a seismic
-4-

LB916 LB916
2026 2026
risk assessment;
(12) That the storage operator has obtained made a good-faith effort
to obtain the consent of all persons who own reservoir estates within the
storage reservoir; and
(13) That the storage operator has obtained the consent of persons
who own reservoir estates comprising at least sixty percent of the
physical volume contained within the defined storage reservoir;
(13) (14) Whether the storage reservoir contains commercially
valuable minerals. If it does, a permit may be issued only if the
commission is satisfied that the interests of the mineral owners or
mineral lessees will not be adversely affected or have been addressed in
an arrangement entered into by the mineral owners or mineral lessees and
the storage operator. ; and
(15) That all nonconsenting reservoir estate owners are or will be
equitably compensated.
Sec. 6. Section 57-1612, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1612 If a storage operator does not obtain the consent of all
persons who own a reservoir estate within the storage reservoir, the
commission shall not issue a permit. may require that any reservoir
estates owned by nonconsenting owners be included in a storage facility
and subject to geologic storage.
Sec. 7. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 8. Original sections 57-1101, 57-1602, 57-1610, and 57-1612,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-